Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202679-966
School Retirement Fund; state contributions, deposits, and transfers; amount; determination; contingent state contribution; how calculated; hearing.

(1)(a) On the basis of all data in the possession of the retirement board, including such mortality and other tables as are recommended by the actuary engaged by the retirement board and adopted by the retirement board, the retirement board shall annually, on or before July 1, determine the state deposit to be made by the state in the School Retirement Fund for that fiscal year. The amount of such state deposit shall be determined pursuant to section 79-966.01. The retirement board shall thereupon certify the amount of such state deposit, and on the warrant of the Director of Administrative Services, the State Treasurer shall, as of July 1 of such year, transfer from funds appropriated by the state for that purpose to the School Retirement Fund the amount of such state deposit.

(b) Beginning July 1, 2016, the contingent state contribution described in this subsection shall be calculated as a percent of compensation of all members of the retirement system. For any year in which a contribution is made to the School Retirement Fund under this subsection, if the actuary for a retirement system provided for under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act determines that the actuarially required contribution rate, for the fiscal year of the retirement system that begins before the state deposit, exceeds the rate of all contributions required pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act, using the amortization period specified in section 79-966.01, the Class V district school board may request a public hearing of the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature to ask the state to contribute to the Class V school district for contribution to the funds of the retirement system provided for under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act an amount determined by multiplying the compensation of all members of such retirement system by the lesser of the percent of compensation transferred into the School Retirement Fund under this subsection or the percent of compensation of the members of the retirement system provided for under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act needed to meet the actuarially required contribution rate for such system, using the amortization period specified in section 79-966.01. Any additional amount of contribution so calculated, recommended by the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature, and approved by the Legislature, shall be added to the percent specified in subsection (2) of this section for the amount required by subsection (2) of section 79-916 to be contributed to the Class V school district, which shall contribute such amount to the funds of the retirement system provided for under the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.

(2)(a) For each fiscal year beginning July 1, 2014, and prior to July 1, 2025, in addition to the state contributions required by subsections (1) and (3) of this section, the state shall contribute into the School Retirement Fund an amount equal to two percent of the compensation of all members of the retirement system.

(b) Beginning in 2025 and each year thereafter, the state contribution rate under this subsection shall be calculated as of July 1 and based on the funded ratio of the actuarial value of assets in the School Retirement Fund in the most recent previous year as reported in the annual actuarial valuation report for the retirement system produced for the retirement board pursuant to section 84-1503. In addition to the state contributions required by subsections (1) and (3) of this section, the state shall contribute the following amounts into the School Retirement Fund:

(i) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the School Retirement Fund is less than ninety-six percent, an amount equal to two percent of the compensation of all members of the retirement system;

(ii) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the School Retirement Fund is ninety-six percent or greater and less than one hundred percent, an amount equal to seven-tenths of one percent of the compensation of all members of the retirement system; and

(iii) If the funded ratio on the actuarial value of assets in the School Retirement Fund is one hundred percent or greater, no contribution shall be made under this subsection.

(3) In addition to the state deposits and contributions required by subsections (1) and (2) of this section, beginning on July 1, 2005, and each fiscal year thereafter for employees who become members prior to July 1, 2016, the state shall contribute into the Service Annuity Fund such amounts as may be necessary to pay the normal cost and amortize the unfunded actuarial accrued liability of the service annuity benefit established pursuant to sections 79-933 and 79-952 as accrued through the end of the previous fiscal year of the school employees who are members of the retirement system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act.

Laws 1945, c. 219, § 41, p. 651;

R.S.Supp.,1947, § 79-2941;

Laws 1949, c. 256, § 474, p. 853;

Laws 1965, c. 530, § 4, p. 1668;

Laws 1969, c. 735, § 12, p. 2782;

Laws 1971, LB 987, § 25;

Laws 1981, LB 248, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 457, § 5;

Laws 1988, LB 1170, § 10;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-1540;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 601;

Laws 2002, LB 407, § 39;

Laws 2004, LB 1097, § 29;

Laws 2009, LB187, § 2;

Laws 2011, LB382, § 2;

Laws 2013, LB553, § 9;

Laws 2016, LB447, § 13;

Laws 2021, LB17, § 12;

Laws 2021, LB147, § 5;

Laws 2025, LB645, § 3;

Laws 2026, LB820, § 24.
July 18, 2026
Class V School Employees Retirement Act, see section 79-978.01.